Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1076
Epilators; requirements.

All epilators used by an electrologist shall be approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration.

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 40;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 30;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-3,106.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 338.